Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4845
Relation to Electronic Signatures
in Global and National Commerce Act.

The Revised Uniform Anatomical
Gift Act modifies, limits, and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global
and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit,
or supersede section 101(a) of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7001, or authorize electronic
delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act, 15
U.S.C. 7003(b).

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 22.